Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2003.   Records of contracts made -- Audits -- Contract requirements.

The chief procurement officer, the procurement officer, or the head of a procurement unit with independent procurement authority shall maintain a record of all contracts made under Section 63G-6a-408, 63G-6a-802, or 63G-6a-803, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.  The record shall contain each contractor's name, the amount and type of each contract, and a listing of the procurement items to which the contract relates.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

